enhuadj2.foma
         §OEOE17§ -> o // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE17§ -> o // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok1mely18 §OEOE18§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §OEOE18§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE18§ -> a // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE18§ -> a // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok1oa §OEOE11§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §OEOE11§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE11§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE11§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok1oamely §OEOE21§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §OEOE21§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE21§ -> a // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE21§ -> a // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok1oamelyfazek §OEOE21fazek§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §OEOE21fazek§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE21fazek§ -> o // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE21fazek§ -> o // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok1oe §OEOE4§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §OEOE4§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE4§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE4§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok1oea §OEOE4a§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §OEOE4a§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE4a§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE4a§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok1oaoe §OEOE14§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §OEOE14§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE14§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE14§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok1Ueoe §OEOE12§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §OEOE12§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE12§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok2 §OEOE§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok2oeOE §OEOEoe§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOEoe§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOEoe§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok2y §OEOEy§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOEy§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOEy§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok2magas §OEOEmagas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOEmagas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOEmagas§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok2mely §OEOE25§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE25§ -> o // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE25§ -> o // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok2oe §OEOE3§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE3§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE3§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleuk §UUE1§ -> u // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §UUE1§ -> ü // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleukmagas §UUE1magas§ -> ü // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §UUE1magas§ -> ü // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleukmely §UUE21§ -> u // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §UUE21§ -> u // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
# fii fiai fijai
define HarmRuleJPfi §JP1§ -> j || .#. ?* _ ,,
         §JP1§ -> 0 || .#. ?* _ ;
##########################################################
# ja/e ae
# b,d,f: - ja/je
# g,k,l,m,n,p,r,t,v, ny, gy, ty - ja/e és a/e 
# c,h,j,s,z, sz,zs, cs - a/e
###########################################################

# sültje
define HarmRuleJP §JP§ -> j || .#. \"^"* [ Vowel1withy | ConsJaje ]  FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §JP§ -> j || .#. \"^"* ConsAeJaje FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §JP§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* ConsAeJaje FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §J§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* Conss FirstHat _ .o.
         §JP§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* [ ConsAe | Vowel1exc ] FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §JP§ -> j || .#. \"^"* Cons FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJPy §JPy§ -> j || .#. \"^"* [ Vowelwithyy | ConsJaje ] FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §JPy§ -> j || .#. \"^"* ConsAeJaje FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §JPy§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* ConsAeJaje FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §JPy§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* [ ConsAe | Vowel1exc ] FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJPJ §JP§ -> j || .#. \"^"* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJPJ1 §JPJ§ -> j || .#. \"^"* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJPnull §JP§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJPnull1 §JPnull§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJPmagas §JPmagas§ -> j || .#. \"^"* [ Vowel1 | ConsJaje | Cons y ] FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §JPmagas§ -> j || .#. \"^"* ConsAeJaje FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §JPmagas§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* [ Vowel y | ConsAeJaje | ConsAe | Vowel1exc ] FirstHat ?* _ ;
#athénijeim athéniim
define HarmRuleai §AE§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat \j* _ .o.
         §AE§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons+ FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §AE§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* FirstHat ?* j _ .o.
         §AE§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel Cons+ FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §AE§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel Cons* FirstHat ?* j _ ;
define HarmRuleaiyi §AEyi§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* Vowelwithyy FirstHat \%^* \j _ .o.
         §AEyi§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel Cons* FirstHat \%^* _ .o.
         §AEyi§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* FirstHat \%^* _ ;
define HarmRuleaimagas §AEmagas§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* \j _ .o.
         §AEmagas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §AEmagas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel Cons* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleaimely §AE22§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* Vowel FirstHat \j* _ .o.
#bakelitaim barátaim cukkiniaim nem jó!
         §AE22§ -> a // .#. \"^"* Vowel Cons+ FirstHat ?* j* _ .o.  
#cukkinijaim hajójaim      
         §AE22§ -> a // .#. \"^"* [ ó | á | é | ő | ű | i | í ] FirstHat ?* j _ ;
# fii fiai fijai
define HarmRuleaimelyfi §AE221§ -> a || .#. ?* j _ .o.
         §AE221§ -> 0 // .#. ?* \j _ ;
define HarmRuleaitok2 §OEOE2§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE2§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleaitok2magas §OEOE2magas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE2magas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleaitok2mely §OEOE22§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §OEOE22§ -> o // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define Suffixb  §b§ -> 0 // b b [ %^ | 0 | FirstHat ] _ .o.
         §b§ -> b // \[ b b ] [ %^ | 0 | FirstHat ] _ ;
define Suffixh  §h§ -> 0 // h h [ %^ | 0 | FirstHat ] _ .o.
         §h§ -> h // \[ h h ] [ %^ | 0 | FirstHat ] _ ;
define Suffixk  §k§ -> 0 // k k [ %^ | 0 | FirstHat ] _ .o.
         §k§ -> k // \[ k k ] [ %^ | 0 | FirstHat ] _ ;
define Suffixn  §n§ -> 0 // n n [ %^ | 0 | FirstHat ] _ .o.
         §n§ -> n // \[ n n ] [ %^ | 0 | FirstHat ] _ ;
define Suffixr  §r§ -> 0 // r r [ %^ | 0 | FirstHat ] _ .o.
         §r§ -> r // \[ r r ] [ %^ | 0 | FirstHat ] _ ;
define Suffixt  §t§ -> 0 // t t [ %^ | 0 | FirstHat ] _ .o.
         §t§ -> t // \[ t t ] [ %^ | 0 | FirstHat ] _ ;


define ToUpCase [a:A|á:Á|b:B|c:C|d:D|e:E|é:É|f:F|g:G|h:H|i:I|í:Í|j:J|k:K|l:L|m:M|n:N|o:O|ó:Ó|ö:Ö|ő:Ő|p:P|q:Q|r:R|s:S|t:T|u:U|ú:Ú|ü:Ü|ű:Ű|v:V|w:W|x:X|y:Y|z:Z] ?* | ?* ;

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup   "^"    -> 0;
define CleanupEndings "^" {+cDis} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cEss} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cSoc} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cTem} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cPosss1p} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cPosss2p} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cPosss3p} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cPossp1p} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cPossp2p} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cPossp3p} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cPosss1s} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cPosss2s} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cPosss3s} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cPossp1s} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cPossp2s} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cPossp3s} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cPlur} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cFam} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cGenpl} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cGens} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cAbl} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cAcc} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cAde} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cAll} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cCau} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cDat} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cDel} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cEla} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cFac} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cFor} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+ccForp} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cxForpen} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cIll} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cIne} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cIns} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cNom} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cSub} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cSup} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cTer} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cFkepi} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cFkepnyi} -> 0 ,,
            "^" {+cMid} -> 0;

#set flag-is-epsilon ON
echo ">>> read in enhuadj1 <<<"
read lexc /home/en/program/foma/tktest/lexc/adj/enhuadj1.lexc
define Lexiconadj1

define Grammaradj1 Lexiconadj1      .o. 
        Etoee       .o. 
        Atoaa       .o. 
        Changez2     .o.
        HarmRulejaje   .o. 
        CleanupEndings  .o.
        Suffixb      .o. 
        Suffixh      .o. 
        Suffixk      .o. 
        Suffixn      .o. 
        Suffixr      .o. 
        Suffixt      .o. 
        HarmRuleBB    .o.
        HarmRulePlur   .o. 
        HarmRulePluroa  .o.
        HarmRulePlure   .o. 
        HarmRulePluroae  .o.
        HarmRuleJ     .o. 
        HarmRuleul    .o. 
        HarmRuleuk    .o. 
        HarmRuleenkent  .o. 
        HarmRuleestul   .o. 
        HarmRuleunk    .o. 
        HarmRuleotok1   .o. 
        HarmRuleotok1oeO1 .o.
        HarmRuleotok1oa  .o. 
        HarmRuleotok1oea .o.
        HarmRuleotok2   .o. 
        HarmRuleJP    .o. 
        HarmRuleai    .o. 
        HarmRuleaitok2  .o. 
        HarmRuleAcc    .o. 
        HarmRuleAcc1   .o.
        HarmRuleAccoez2  .o. 
        HarmRuletol    .o. 
        HarmRuleAAA    .o. 
        HarmRulehoz    .o. 
        HarmRuleVV    .o. 
        HarmRuleAA    .o. 
        HarmRuleonen   .o. 
        HarmRuleAccoe   .o.
        HarmRuleestuloe  .o.
        HarmRuleestuloeEOA  .o.
        HarmRuleenkentoe .o.
        HarmRuleenkentoez3 .o.
        HarmRuleotok1oe  .o.
        HarmRuleotok2oe  .o.
        HarmRuleotok2oeOE .o.
        HarmRulePluroe  .o.
        HarmRuleonenmid  .o.
        HarmRuleonenoe  .o.
        HarmRuleonenoezoe  .o.
        Cleanup            .o.
        ToUpCase ;

echo ">>> read in enhuadjbator <<<"
read lexc /home/en/program/foma/tktest/lexc/adj/enhuadjbator.lexc
define Lexiconadjbator
